Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6157YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2730 Section 1. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. It shall be an unlawful practice for a 3 retailer to charge a consumer a price for an item at the time 4 of checkout that is higher than the price posted, displayed, 5 or otherwise represented on the retailerâs shelf, display, or 6 point of consumer selection at the time the consumer selected 7 the item. This paragraph does not prohibit a retailer from 8 charging a lower price at checkout than the price posted, 9 displayed, or otherwise represented at the time the consumer 10 selected the item. 11